North Dakota statutes. TITLE 30.1 Uniform Probate Code
CHAPTER 30.1-25 Foreign Representatives — Judgments and Personal Representatives

30.1-25-01. (4-301)
Jurisdiction by act of foreign personal representative.

A foreign personal representative submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in any proceeding relating to the estate by:

Filing authenticated copies of the foreign personal representative’s appointment as provided in section 30.1-24-05;

Receiving payment of money or taking delivery of personal property under section 30.1-24-02; or

Doing any act as a personal representative in this state which would have given the state jurisdiction over the foreign personal representative as an individual.

Jurisdiction under subsection 2 is limited to the money or value of personal property collected.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1.

Collateral References.

Action for death under statute of forum providing for action by personal representative, capacity of foreign domiciliary or of ancillary personal representative to maintain, 52 A.L.R.2d 1048.

Equity actions: applications of rule permitting courts to exercise jurisdiction over equity actions against foreign personal representatives where there are assets within form, 53 A.L.R.2d 323.

Isolated acts: state statutes or rules of court conferring in personam jurisdiction over nonresidents on the basis of isolated acts or transactions within state as applicable to personal representative of deceased nonresident, 19 A.L.R.3d 171.

30.1-25-02. (4-302)
Jurisdiction by act of decedent.

In addition to jurisdiction conferred by section 30.1-25-01, a foreign personal representative is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to the same extent that the decedent was subject to jurisdiction immediately prior to death.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1.

30.1-25-03. (4-303)
Service on foreign personal representative.

Service of process may be made upon the foreign personal representative by certified mail, addressed to the foreign personal representative’s last reasonably ascertainable address, requesting a return receipt signed by the addressee only. Notice by ordinary first-class mail is sufficient if certified mail service to the addressee is unavailable. Service may be made upon a foreign personal representative in the manner in which service could have been made under other laws of this state on either the foreign personal representative or the decedent immediately prior to death.

If service is made upon a foreign personal representative as provided in subsection 1, the foreign personal representative shall be allowed at least thirty days within which to appear or respond.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1.

30.1-25-04. (4-401)
Effect of adjudication for or against personal representative.

An adjudication rendered in any jurisdiction in favor of or against any personal representative of the estate is as binding on the local personal representative as if the local personal representative were a party to the adjudication.

Source:

S.L. 1973 ch. 257, § 1.